Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-450
Plan of reorganization; adoption; county clerk; duties.

If the plan of reorganization is adopted, the county clerk shall proceed to cause the changes, realignment, and adjustment of districts to be carried out as provided in the plan. The county clerk shall classify the school districts according to the law applicable to the size, location, and population of the reorganized district. He or she shall also file certificates with the county assessor, county treasurer, and state committee showing the boundaries of the various districts under the plan of reorganization adopted.

Laws 1949, c. 249, § 17, p. 679;

R.R.S.1943, § 79-426.17;

Laws 1963, c. 479, § 12, p. 1544;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.18;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 199;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 52.

Former section 79-801.02 is limited to provisions of former section 79-801, and is not applicable to school district boundary changes under other statutes. Corcoran v. Boone County Board of Equalization, 196 Neb. 363, 243 N.W.2d 60 (1976).

Action of county superintendent under this section is ministerial only. Longe v. County of Wayne, 175 Neb. 245, 121 N.W.2d 196 (1963).